Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.060

Loans to officers or employees.

(1) Any bank shall be permitted to make loans to any employee of such corporation, or to purchase, discount or acquire, as security or otherwise, the obligation or debt of any employee to any other person, to the same extent as if the employee were in no way connected with the corporation. Any bank shall be permitted to make loans to any officer of such corporation, or to purchase, discount or acquire, as security or otherwise, the obligation or debt of any officer to any other person: PROVIDED, That the total value of the loans made and obligation acquired for any one officer shall not exceed such amount as shall be prescribed by the director pursuant to regulations adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That no such loan shall be made, or obligation acquired, in excess of five percent of a bank's capital and unimpaired surplus or twenty-five thousand dollars, whichever is larger, unless a resolution authorizing the same shall be adopted by a vote of a majority of the board of directors of such corporation prior to the making of such loan or discount, and such vote and resolution shall be entered in the corporate minutes. In no event shall the loan or obligation acquired exceed five hundred thousand dollars in the aggregate without prior approval by a majority of the corporation's board of directors. No loan in excess of five percent of a bank's capital and unimpaired surplus or twenty-five thousand dollars, whichever is larger, shall be made by any bank to any director of such corporation nor shall the note or obligation in excess of five percent of a bank's capital and unimpaired surplus or twenty-five thousand dollars, whichever is larger, of such director be discounted by any such corporation, or by any officer or employee thereof in its behalf, unless a resolution authorizing the same shall be adopted by a vote of a majority of the entire board of directors of such corporation exclusive of the vote of such interested director, and such vote and resolution shall be entered in the corporate minutes. In no event may the loan or obligation acquired exceed five hundred thousand dollars in the aggregate without prior approval by a majority of the corporation's board of directors.

Each bank shall at such times and in such form as may be required by the director, report to the director all outstanding loans to directors of such bank.

The amount of any endorsement or agreement of suretyship or guaranty of any such director to the corporation shall be construed to be a loan within the provisions of this section. Any modification of the terms of an existing obligation (excepting only such modifications as merely extend or renew the indebtedness) shall be construed to be a loan within the meaning of this section.

(2) "Unimpaired surplus," as used in this section, consists of the sum of the following amounts:

(a) Fifty percent of the reserve for possible loan losses;

(b) Subordinated notes and debentures;

(c) Surplus;

(d) Undivided profits; and

(e) Reserve for contingencies and other capital reserves, excluding accrued dividends on preferred stock.

[ 2014 c 37 s 179; 1994 c 92 s 69; 1985 c 305 s 6; 1969 c 136 s 5; 1959 c 165 s 1; 1955 c 33 s 30.12.060. Prior: 1947 c 147 s 1, part; 1933 c 42 s 22, part; 1917 c 80 s 52, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3259, part. Formerly RCW 30.12.060.]